Missouri, session 2026, SB1559.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 105.915, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 105.915,
to read as follows:
105.915. 1. The board of trustees of the Missouri
state employees' retirement system shall administer the
deferred compensation fund for the employees of the state of
Missouri that was previously administered by the deferred
compensation commission, as established in section 105.910,
prior to August 28, 2007. The board shall be vested with
the same powers that it has under chapter 104 to enable it
and its officers, employees, and agents to administer the
fund under sections 105.900 to 105.927.
2. Except as provided in this subsection,
participation in such plan shall be by a specific written
agreement between state employees and the state, which shall
provide for the deferral of such amounts of compensation as
requested by the employee subject to any limitations imposed
under federal law. Participating employees must authorize
that such deferrals be made from their wages for the purpose
of participation in such program. An election to defer
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1559 2
compensation shall be made before the beginning of the
[month in] payroll period for which the compensation is
paid. Contributions shall be made for payroll periods
[occurring on or after the first day of the month] beginning
after the election is made.
3. Each employee eligible to participate in the plan
hired or rehired on or after July 1, 2012, shall be enrolled
in the plan automatically and his or her employer shall, in
accordance with the plan document, withhold and contribute
to the plan an amount equal to one percent of eligible
compensation received on and after the date of hire, unless
the employee elects not to participate in the plan within
the first thirty days of employment, and in that event, any
amounts contributed and earnings thereon will be refunded by
the plan to the employee pursuant to the procedure contained
in the plan documents. Employees who are employed by a
state college or university shall not be automatically
enrolled but may elect to participate in the plan and make
contributions in accordance with the terms of the plan.
4. Effective July 1, 2027:
(1) The plan document shall provide for automatic
increases in the deferral amount contributed by a
participating employee commencing with the first payroll
period following the employee's one-year anniversary date of
employment or reemployment, whichever is later. The
deferral amount shall increase annually by one-half of one
percent until the amount reaches ten percent of the
employee's eligible compensation or the limitation imposed
under federal law, whichever is less;
(2) Each employee eligible to participate in the plan
who was last hired or rehired on or after July 1, 2012, and
before July 1, 2027, who was automatically enrolled in the

SB 1559 3
plan pursuant to subsection 3 of this section, and whose
contribution is equal to one percent of eligible
compensation on the effective date, shall be enrolled in
such automatic increases; and
(3) Each employee eligible to participate in the plan
who was last hired or rehired on or after July 1, 2027,
shall be enrolled in such automatic increases.
5. Employees who are enrolled automatically or whose
deferral amounts are automatically increased may elect to
change the contribution rate in accordance with the terms of
the plan. Employees who elect not to participate in the
plan may at a later date elect to participate in the plan
and make contributions in accordance with the terms of the
plan. All assets and income of such fund shall be held in
trust by the board for the exclusive benefit of participants
and their beneficiaries. Assets of such trust, and the
trust established pursuant to section 105.927, may be pooled
solely for investment management purposes with assets of the
trust established under section 104.320.
[3.] 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of
sections 105.900 to 105.927, funds held for the state by the
board in accordance with written deferred compensation
agreements between the state and participating employees may
be invested in such investments as are deemed appropriate by
the board. All administrative costs of the program
described in this section, including staffing and overhead
expenses, may be paid out of assets of the fund, which may
reduce the amount due participants in the fund. Such
investments shall not be construed to be a prohibited use of
the general assets of the state.

SB 1559 4
[4.] 7. Investments offered under the deferred
compensation fund for the employees of the state of Missouri
shall be made available at the discretion of the board.
[5.] 8. The board and employees of the Missouri state
employees' retirement system shall be immune from suit and
shall not be subject to any claim or liability associated
with any administrative actions or decisions made by the
commission with regard to the deferred compensation program
prior to the transfer made to the board under section
105.910.
[6.] 9. The board and employees of the system shall
not be liable for the investment decisions made or not made
by participating employees as long as the board acts with
the same skill, prudence, and diligence in the selection and
monitoring of providers of investment products, education,
advice, or any default investment option, under the
circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting
in a similar capacity and familiar with those matters would
use in the conduct of a similar enterprise with similar aims.
[7.] 10. The system shall be immune from suit and
100 shall not be subject to any claim or liability associated
101 with the administration of the deferred compensation fund by
102 the board and employees of the system.
103 [8.] 11. Beginning on or after September 1, 2011, if a
104 participant under the deferred compensation plan or the plan
105 established under section 105.927 is married on the date of
106 his or her death, the participant's surviving spouse shall
107 be automatically designated as the primary beneficiary under
108 both plans, unless the surviving spouse consented in
109 writing, witnessed by a notary public, to allow the
110 participant to designate a nonspouse beneficiary. As used
111 in this subsection, "surviving spouse" means the spouse as

SB 1559 5
112 defined pursuant to section 104.012 to whom the participant
113 is lawfully married on the date of death of the participant,
114 provided that a former spouse shall be treated as the
115 surviving spouse of the participant to the extent provided
116 under a judgment, decree, or order that relates to child
117 support, alimony payments, or marital property rights made
118 under Missouri domestic relations law that creates or
119 recognizes the existence of such former spouse's right to
120 receive all or a portion expressed as a stated dollar amount
121 or specific percentage stated in integers of the benefits
122 payable from such plan upon the death of the participant.
123 This subsection shall not apply to beneficiary designations
124 made prior to September 1, 2011.
125 [9.] 12. The board may adopt and amend plan documents
126 to change the terms and conditions of the deferred
127 compensation plan and the plan established under section
128 105.927 that are consistent with federal law.
✓